Maine, session 132, LD238.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §85, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2023, c. 132, §1, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
7. Delegation. A person acting under delegated authority pursuant to chapter 36 or 48
may not use or be governed by a license issued pursuant to this chapter while acting under
that delegated authority, and a person acting under a license issued pursuant to this chapter
may not be governed by delegated authority or engage in any activities delegated pursuant
to chapter 36 or 48 while acting under a license issued pursuant to this chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR0373(03)